Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-5803.01
Acute care bed, defined.

Acute care bed means a bed in a hospital that is or will be licensed under the Health Care Facility Licensure Act for acute care services or a bed that is part of a hospital or unit of a hospital that is excluded from the prospective payment system under Title XVIII of the federal Social Security Act, as amended, as a rehabilitation hospital or rehabilitation unit.

Laws 1997, LB 798, § 5;

Laws 2000, LB 819, § 112.

Health Care Facility Licensure Act, see section 71-401.